incubator/apertium-la-es/apertium-la-es.la.dix
    <pardef n="bracc/ae__n">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ae</l>
          <r>a<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/><s n="nom"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>arum</l>
          <r>a<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/><s n="gen"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>is</l>
          <r>a<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/><s n="dat"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>as</l>
          <r>a<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/><s n="acc"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>is</l>
          <r>a<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/><s n="abl"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ae</l>
          <r>a<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/><s n="voc"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>is</l>
          <r>a<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/><s n="loc"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>
    <pardef n="agricol/a__n">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>a</l>
          <r>a<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/><s n="nom"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ae</l>
          <r>a<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/><s n="gen"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e r="LR" c="Poetic">
        <p>
          <l>ai</l>
          <r>a<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/><s n="gen"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e r="LR" c="Older form">
        <p>
          <l>as</l>
          <r>a<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/><s n="gen"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ae</l>
          <r>a<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/><s n="dat"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>am</l>
          <r>a<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/><s n="acc"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>a</l>
          <r>a<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/><s n="abl"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>a</l>
          <r>a<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/><s n="voc"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ae</l>
          <r>a<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/><s n="loc"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ae</l>
          <r>a<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/><s n="nom"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>arum</l>
          <r>a<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/><s n="gen"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>is</l>
          <r>a<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/><s n="dat"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>as</l>
          <r>a<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/><s n="acc"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>is</l>
          <r>a<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/><s n="abl"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ae</l>
          <r>a<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/><s n="voc"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>is</l>
          <r>a<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/><s n="loc"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>
    <pardef n="comet/es__n">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>es</l>
          <r>es<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/><s n="nom"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ae</l>
          <r>es<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/><s n="gen"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ae</l>
          <r>es<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/><s n="dat"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>en</l>
          <r>es<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/><s n="acc"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e r="LR">
        <p>
          <l>am</l>
          <r>es<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/><s n="acc"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>a</l>
          <r>es<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/><s n="abl"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>e</l>
          <r>es<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/><s n="voc"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e r="LR">
        <p>
          <l>a</l>
          <r>es<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/><s n="voc"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ae</l>
          <r>es<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/><s n="loc"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ae</l>
          <r>es<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/><s n="nom"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>arum</l>
          <r>es<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/><s n="gen"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>is</l>
          <r>es<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/><s n="dat"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>as</l>
          <r>es<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/><s n="acc"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>is</l>
          <r>es<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/><s n="abl"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ae</l>
          <r>es<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/><s n="voc"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>is</l>
          <r>es<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/><s n="loc"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>
    <!-- Second Declension -->
    <pardef n="mur/us__n">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>us</l>
          <r>us<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/><s n="nom"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>i</l>
          <r>us<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/><s n="gen"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>o</l>
          <r>us<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/><s n="dat"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>um</l>
          <r>us<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/><s n="acc"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>o</l>
          <r>us<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/><s n="abl"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>e</l>
          <r>us<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/><s n="voc"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>o</l>
          <r>us<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/><s n="loc"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>i</l>
          <r>us<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/><s n="nom"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>orum</l>
          <r>us<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/><s n="gen"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>is</l>
          <r>us<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/><s n="dat"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>os</l>
          <r>us<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/><s n="acc"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>is</l>
          <r>us<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/><s n="abl"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>i</l>
          <r>us<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/><s n="voc"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>is</l>
          <r>us<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/><s n="loc"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>

    <e lm="braccae"><i>bracc</i><par n="bracc/ae__n"/></e>
    <e lm="thermae"><i>therm</i><par n="bracc/ae__n"/></e>
    <e lm="agricola"><i>agricol</i><par n="agricol/a__n"/></e>
    <e lm="astronauta"><i>astronaut</i><par n="agricol/a__n"/></e>
    <e lm="auriga"><i>aurig</i><par n="agricol/a__n"/></e>
    <e lm="incola"><i>incol</i><par n="agricol/a__n"/></e>
    <e lm="nauta"><i>naut</i><par n="agricol/a__n"/></e>
    <e lm="poeta"><i>poet</i><par n="agricol/a__n"/></e>
    <e a="agfl-lat" lm="propheta"><i>prophet</i><par n="agricol/a__n"/></e>
    <e lm="pirata"><i>pirat</i><par n="agricol/a__n"/></e>
    <e lm="scriba"><i>scrib</i><par n="agricol/a__n"/></e>
    <e a="agfl-lat" lm="abortivus"><i>abortiv</i><par n="mur/us__n"/></e>
    <e a="agfl-lat" lm="acervus"><i>acerv</i><par n="mur/us__n"/></e>
    <e a="agfl-lat" lm="adversarius"><i>adversari</i><par n="mur/us__n"/></e>
    <e a="agfl-lat" lm="alveus"><i>alve</i><par n="mur/us__n"/></e>
    <e a="agfl-lat" lm="amicus"><i>amic</i><par n="mur/us__n"/></e>
    <e a="agfl-lat" lm="angulus"><i>angul</i><par n="mur/us__n"/></e>
    <e a="agfl-lat" lm="annus"><i>ann</i><par n="mur/us__n"/></e>
    <e a="agfl-lat" lm="aquilus"><i>aquil</i><par n="mur/us__n"/></e>
    <e a="agfl-lat" lm="arcus"><i>arc</i><par n="mur/us__n"/></e>
    <e a="agfl-lat" lm="asinus"><i>asin</i><par n="mur/us__n"/></e>
    <e a="agfl-lat" lm="autus"><i>aut</i><par n="mur/us__n"/></e>
    <e a="agfl-lat" lm="baculus"><i>bacul</i><par n="mur/us__n"/></e>
    <e a="agfl-lat" lm="balanus"><i>balan</i><par n="mur/us__n"/></e>
    <e a="agfl-lat" lm="calculus"><i>calcul</i><par n="mur/us__n"/></e>
    <e a="agfl-lat" lm="campus"><i>camp</i><par n="mur/us__n"/></e>
    <e a="agfl-lat" lm="canticus"><i>cantic</i><par n="mur/us__n"/></e>
    <e a="agfl-lat" lm="capitulus"><i>capitul</i><par n="mur/us__n"/></e>
    <e a="agfl-lat" lm="cattus"><i>catt</i><par n="mur/us__n"/></e>
    <e a="agfl-lat" lm="christianus"><i>christian</i><par n="mur/us__n"/></e>
    <e a="agfl-lat" lm="cibus"><i>cib</i><par n="mur/us__n"/></e>
    <e a="agfl-lat" lm="daemonus"><i>daemon</i><par n="mur/us__n"/></e>
    <e a="agfl-lat" lm="diabolus"><i>diabol</i><par n="mur/us__n"/></e>
    <e a="agfl-lat" lm="discipulus"><i>discipul</i><par n="mur/us__n"/></e>
    <e a="agfl-lat" lm="episcopus"><i>episcop</i><par n="mur/us__n"/></e>
    <e a="agfl-lat" lm="estus"><i>est</i><par n="mur/us__n"/></e>
    <e a="agfl-lat" lm="gladius"><i>gladi</i><par n="mur/us__n"/></e>
    <e a="agfl-lat" lm="hortus"><i>hort</i><par n="mur/us__n"/></e>
    <e a="agfl-lat" lm="hymnus"><i>hymn</i><par n="mur/us__n"/></e>
    <e a="agfl-lat" lm="laqueus"><i>laque</i><par n="mur/us__n"/></e>
    <e a="agfl-lat" lm="legionarius"><i>legionari</i><par n="mur/us__n"/></e>
    <e a="agfl-lat" lm="ludus"><i>lud</i><par n="mur/us__n"/></e>
    <e a="agfl-lat" lm="mendicus"><i>mendic</i><par n="mur/us__n"/></e>
    <e a="agfl-lat" lm="monachus"><i>monach</i><par n="mur/us__n"/></e>
    <e a="agfl-lat" lm="mundus"><i>mund</i><par n="mur/us__n"/></e>
    <e a="agfl-lat" lm="numerus"><i>numer</i><par n="mur/us__n"/></e>
    <e a="agfl-lat" lm="oculus"><i>ocul</i><par n="mur/us__n"/></e>
    <e a="agfl-lat" lm="orbus"><i>orb</i><par n="mur/us__n"/></e>
    <e a="agfl-lat" lm="ramus"><i>ram</i><par n="mur/us__n"/></e>
    <e a="agfl-lat" lm="sagittarius"><i>sagittari</i><par n="mur/us__n"/></e>
    <e a="agfl-lat" lm="servulus"><i>servul</i><par n="mur/us__n"/></e>
    <e a="agfl-lat" lm="socius"><i>soci</i><par n="mur/us__n"/></e>
    <e a="agfl-lat" lm="thesaurus"><i>thesaur</i><par n="mur/us__n"/></e>
    <e a="agfl-lat" lm="tumulus"><i>tumul</i><par n="mur/us__n"/></e>
    <e a="agfl-lat" lm="tyrannus"><i>tyrann</i><par n="mur/us__n"/></e>
    <e a="agfl-lat" lm="uterus"><i>uter</i><par n="mur/us__n"/></e>
    <e a="agfl-lat" lm="venaticus"><i>venatic</i><par n="mur/us__n"/></e>
    <e a="agfl-lat" lm="ventus"><i>vent</i><par n="mur/us__n"/></e>
    <e a="agfl-lat" lm="vicinus"><i>vicin</i><par n="mur/us__n"/></e>
    <e a="agfl-lat" lm="virtus"><i>virt</i><par n="mur/us__n"/></e>
    <e a="agfl-lat" lm="vulnus"><i>vuln</i><par n="mur/us__n"/></e>
    <e lm="ablativus"><i>ablativ</i><par n="mur/us__n"/></e>
    <e lm="actionarius"><i>actionari</i><par n="mur/us__n"/></e>
    <e lm="alcoranus"><i>alcoran</i><par n="mur/us__n"/></e>
    <e lm="angelus"><i>angel</i><par n="mur/us__n"/></e>
    <e lm="anthropocentrismus"><i>anthropocentrism</i><par n="mur/us__n"/></e>
    <e lm="araneolus"><i>araneol</i><par n="mur/us__n"/></e>
    <e lm="architectus"><i>architect</i><par n="mur/us__n"/></e>
    <e lm="atheismus"><i>atheism</i><par n="mur/us__n"/></e>
    <e lm="attornatus"><i>attornat</i><par n="mur/us__n"/></e>
    <e lm="baptismus"><i>baptism</i><par n="mur/us__n"/></e>
    <e lm="bibliothecarius"><i>bibliothecari</i><par n="mur/us__n"/></e>
